Massachusetts, session 194th, S264.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The General Laws are hereby amended by inserting after chapter 93L the following
chapter:-
CHAPTER 93M
USE OF CHATBOTS BY COMMERCIAL ENTITIES
Section 1. Definitions
As used in this chapter, the following words shall, unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, have the following meanings:-
"Chatbot", an automated program designed to simulate conversation with human users
whether through the use of generative artificial intelligence or other similar technology. Such a
program may use audio, visual, or textual methods, or a combination thereof, to communicate.
of 2

Section 2. Clear disclosure of chatbots
Any commercial entity deploying a chatbot shall clearly and conspicuously disclose to
the person with whom the chatbot interacts that the person is interacting with a chatbot and not a
human.
Section 3. Representations made by chatbots
Interactions with, including but not limited to any information or representations
provided by, a chatbot deployed by a commercial entity shall have the same legal force and
effect as interactions with a person employed by, or acting as an agent of, the commercial entity.
Use of a disclaimer shall not constitute a defense under this chapter, chapter 93A, or any other
cause of action under the laws of the commonwealth.
Section 4. Enforcement
In addition to any other remedies that may be available, a violation of this chapter shall
be deemed to be an unfair method of competition and an unfair or deceptive act or practice in the
conduct of trade or commerce in violation of section 2 of chapter 93A
of 2